California, session 20252026, SB926.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the Funding of Proposition 36 Act.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The people of the State of California, by a statewide vote of over 68 percent, including a majority of the votes cast in all of the 58 counties, approved the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act (Proposition 36) at the November 2024 general election.(b) Proposition 36 establishes a program of justice system reforms focused on rehabilitation, treatment, and recidivism reduction while promoting accountability focused significantly on the provision of mental health and drug-related treatment.(c) Notwithstanding the passage of Proposition 36, the state has not yet provided adequate funding to fully implement the prescribed programs.(d) The continued lack of funding and implementation of Proposition 36 is contrary to the decision of the voters in adopting the measure and undermines its effectiveness.(e) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the implementation of Proposition 36, and to this end, this act provides a transfer of funds for the 2026–2027 fiscal year to fund core services and functions key to the success of the initiative which are heretofore unfunded. 36.(f) This act further requires future Governors to include full funding for the implementation of Proposition 36 in future annual budget proposals.SEC. 3. Section 7599.205 is added to the Government Code, to read:7599.205. (a) The California Public Safety Services Support Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The California Public Safety Services Support Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used to implement the Homelessness, Drug Addition, and Theft Reduction Act.(b)For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Controller shall transfer from the General Fund to the California Public Safety Services Support Fund the amount of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000). (c)The moneys transferred to(b) Any moneys appropriated by the Legislature to the California Public Safety Services Support Fund for the 2026–27 fiscal year are hereby appropriated shall be for the purpose of implementing the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act. The funds shall be administered by the Board of State and Community Corrections and allocated on a statewide equitable basis, taking into account population and caseload, but providing a base minimum, with the funds to be dispersed as follows:(1) To county behavioral health departments to provide treatment services pursuant to Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) To support interventions in the community and to offset incarceration costs of offenders sentenced to county jail for longer terms as a result of the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act.(3) To county probation departments to support the courts, provide individualized assessment to identify treatment options, oversee accountability measures, and supervise an expanded caseload resulting from the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act.(4) To counties for administrative costs, county coordination, and best practice implementation.(5)To district attorneys to offset the additional costs of prosecuting more complex cases pursuant to the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act.(6)To city police departments to support retail theft reduction programs and other interventions in the community consistent with the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act. (d)(c) Beginning in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and annually thereafter, the Governor shall include a proposed transfer from the General Fund to the California Public Safety Services Support Fund of an amount sufficient to fully fund the continued implementation ongoing administration of the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act as part of the Governor’s proposed budget to the Legislature.SEC. 4. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to fund and implement the essential public safety and treatment programs approved by voters in 2024 as quickly as possible, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.